test/src/morphology/N-kiqv_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kiʼv: # Noun 59 'eng /est kivi/fin' - full paradigm
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Nom: kiʼv
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Gen: kiʼv
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Par: kiʼvvõ
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Dat: kiʼvvõn
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Ins: kiʼvkõks
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Ill: kiʼvvõ
     kiʼv+N+Sg+Ela: kiʼvstõ
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Nom: kivīd
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Gen: kivīd
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Par: kivīdi
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Dat: kivīdõn
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Ins: kivīdõks
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Ill: kivīž
     kiʼv+N+Pl+Ela: kivīst
